Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.450

Wood destroying organism inspection report—Unique inspection control number required.

It is unlawful for any person to issue a wood destroying organism inspection report, prepared in conjunction with the transfer, exchange, or refinancing of any structure, without recording a unique inspection control number on the wood destroying organism inspection report. All wood destroying organism inspection reports completed by the same inspector, relating to a single transfer, exchange, or refinance, shall bear the same unique inspection control number. The responsibility to record the unique inspection control number on the report under this section lies solely with the person issuing the wood destroying organism inspection report.

[ 2000 c 96 s 2.]